bg-BG: Изолационен материал: Целулоза; Памук; Fiberglass; Минерална вата; Фенолна пяна; Полиизоцианурат (PIR); Полистирол (PS); Полиуретан (PU); Слама; Вълна; Други
ja: 断熱材: セルロース; コットン; ガラス繊維; ミネラルウール; フェノールフォーム; ポリイソシアヌレート (PIR); ポリスチレン (PS); ポリウレタン (PU); ストロー; ウール; その他
th: วัสดุฉนวน: เซลลูโลส; สำลี; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ใยหิน; โฟมฟีนอลิก; โพลิไอโซไซยานูเรต (PIR); โพลิสไตรีน (PS); โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ฟาง; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
hu: Szigetelőanyag: Cellulóz; Pamut; Üveggyapot; Ásványgyapot; Fenolhab; Poliizocianurát (PIR); Polisztirol (PS); Poliuretán (PU); Szalma; Gyapjú; Egyéb
it: Materiale isolante: Cellulosa; Cotone; Vetroresina; Lana minerale; Schiuma fenolica; Poliisocianurato (PIR); Polistirene (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Paglia; Lana; Altro
ko: 단열재: 셀룰로오스; 면; 유리 섬유; 미네랄 울; 페놀폼; 폴리이소시아누레이트(PIR); 폴리스티렌(PS); 폴리우레탄(PU); 빨대; 울; 기타
nb: Isolasjonsmateriale: Cellulose; Bomull; Glassfiber; Mineralull; Fenolskum; Polyisocyanurat (PIR); Polystyren (PS); Polyuretan (PU); Strå; Ull; Annet
lt-LT: Izoliacinė medžiaga: Celiuliozė; Medvilnė; Stiklo pluoštas; Mineralinė vata; Fenolio puta; Poliizocianuratas (PIR); Polistirenas (PS); Poliuretanas (PU); Šiaudai; Vilna; Kita
ru: Материал изоляции: Целлюлоза; Хлопок; Стекловолокно; Минеральная вата; Фенольная пена; Полиизоцианурат (PIR); Полистирол (ПС); Полиуретан (ПУ); Солома; Шерсть; Другой
pl: Materiał izolacji: Celuloza; Bawełna; Włókno szklane; Wełna mineralna; Pianka fenolowa; Poliizocyjanur (PIR); Polistyren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Słoma; Wełna; Inne
sv: Isolering - material: Cellulosa; Bomull; Glasfiber; Mineralull; Fenolskum; Polyisocyanurat (PIR); Polystyren (PS); Polyuretan (PU); Strå; Ylle; Övrigt
pt-BR: Material isolante: Celulose; Algodão; Fibra de vidro; Lã mineral; Espuma fenólica; Poliisocianurato (PIR); Poliestireno (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Canudo; Lã; Outro
nl: Materiaal islolatie: Cellulose; Katoen; Glasvezel; Minerale wol; Felonisch schuim; Polyisocyanurate (PIR); Polystyreen (PS); Polyurethaan (PU); Rietje; Wol; Andere
sl-SI: Izolacijski material: Celuloza; Bombaž; Steklena vlakna; Mineralna volna; Fenolna pena; Poliizocianurat (PIR); Polistiren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Slama; Volna; Drugo
vi: Vật liệu cách nhiệt: Cellulose; Vải bông; Sợi thủy tinh; Len khoáng; Bọt phenolic; Polyisocyanurat (PIR); Polystyrene (PS); Polyurethane (PU); Rơm rạ; Len; Khác
fi: Eristysmateriaali: Selluloosa; Puuvilla; Lasikuitu; Mineraalivilla; Fenolivaahto; Polyisosyanuraatti (PIR); Polystyreeni (PS); Polyuretaani (PU); Olki; Villa; Muu
cs: Materiál izolace: Celulóza; Bavlna; Skelná vata; Minerální vlna; Fenolická pěna; Polyisokyanurát (PIR); Polystyren (PS); Polyuretan (PU); Sláma; Vlna; Jiné
da: Isoleringsmateriale: Cellulose; Bomuld; Glasfiber; Mineraluld; Fenolisk skum; Polyisocyanurat (PIR); Polystyren (PS); Polyurethan (PU); Strå; Uld; Andet
es: Material de aislamiento: Celulosa; Algodón; Fibra de vidrio; Lana mineral; Espuma fenólica; Poliisocianurato (PIR); Poliestireno (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Paja; Lana; Otros
pt-PT: Material isolante: Celulose; Algodão; Fibra de vidro; Lã mineral; Espuma fenólica; Poliisocianurato (PIR); Poliestireno (PS); Poliuretano (PU); Canudo; Lã; Outro
fr: Matériau isolant: Cellulose; Coton; Fibre de verre; Laine minérale; Mousse phénolique; Polyisocyanurate (PIR); Polystyrène (PS); Polyuréthane (PU); Paille; Laine; Autre
zh-CN: 绝缘材料: 纤维素; 棉布; 玻璃纤维; 矿棉; 酚醛泡沫; 聚异氰脲酸酯 (PIR); 聚苯乙烯 (PS); 聚氨酯 (PU); 稻草; 羊毛; 其他
en: Insulation material: Cellulose; Cotton; Fiberglass; Mineral wool; Phenolic foam; Polyisocyanurate (PIR); Polystyrene (PS); Polyurethane (PU); Straw; Wool; Other
el: Μονωτικό υλικό: Κυτταρίνη; Βαμβάκι; Υαλοβάμβακας; Ορυκτοβάμβακας; Φαινολικός αφρός; Πολυισοκυανικό (PIR); Πολυστυρένιο (PS); Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Άχυρο; Μαλλί; Άλλο
sk-SK: Izolačný materiál: Celulóza; Bavlna; Sklolaminát; Minerálna vlna; Fenolická pena; Polyizokyanurát (PIR); Polystyrén (PS); Polyuretán (PU); Slamka; Vlna; Iné
hr-HR: Materijal izolacije: Celuloza; Pamuk; Stakloplastika; Mineralna vuna; Fenolna pjena; Poliizocijanurat (PIR); Polistiren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Slama; Vuna; Ostalo
de: Dämmmaterial: Zellulose; Baumwolle; Fiberglas; Mineralwolle; Phenolschaum; Polyisocyanurat (PIR); Polystyrol (PS); Polyurethan (PU); Stroh; Wolle; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Material izolație: Celuloză; Bumbac; Fibră de sticlă; Vată minerală; Spumă fenolică; Poliizocianurat (PIR); Polistiren (PS); Poliuretan (PU); Paie; Lână; Altele
tr: Yalıtım malzemesi: Selüloz; Pamuk; Fiberglas; Mineral yün; Fenolik köpük; Poliizosiyanürat (PIR); Polistiren (PS); Poliüretan (PU); Saman; Yünlüler; Diğer
zh-TW: 絕緣材料: 纖維素; 棉布; 玻璃纖維; 礦棉; 酚醛泡棉; 聚異氰脲酸酯 (PIR); 聚苯乙烯 (PS); 聚氨酯 (PU); 稻草; 羊毛; 其他